Hawaii statutes.
§481-25 Additional display requirements.
Any person who represents by sign, window display, label, advertising, or by
any other means, that the person sells goods sold by or manufactured for the
government of the United States or any agency or department thereof, and who
also sells other goods, shall specifically distinguish the two classes of
merchandise by individual label on item of goods displayed for sale or by
segregation into labeled bins, compartments, or areas. [L 1945, c 214, §5; RL
1955, §205-44; HRS §481-25; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next